Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the Department of Transportation, for the biennium
beginning July 1,  2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $25,314,930 for debt service
on safety improvement projects and the State Radio Project.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts and fed-
eral funds received as reimbursement from the United States Department  of Transportation,
but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds not described in this section, collected or re-
ceived by the Department of Transportation, for the following purposes:
(1) Capital improvement............. $ 17,353,672
(2) Maintenance and emergency
relief programs ..................... $ 569,573,711
(3) Preservation program ........... $ 405,191,616
(4) Bridge program..................... $ 557,197,477
(5) Operations program .............. $ 387,456,104
(6) Modernization program......... $ 167,639,107
(7) Special programs................... $ 423,000,380
(8) Local government program ... $ 207,531,613
(9) Driver and motor vehicle
services ................................. $ 243,509,657
(10) Motor carrier transportation $ 70,619,707
(11) Transportation program
development.......................... $ 183,731,320
(12) Public transit ........................ $ 246,633,904
(13) Rail........................................ $ 56,748,837
(14) Transportation safety ........... $ 19,189,241
(15) Central services .................... $ 265,672,167
(16) Debt service .......................... $ 384,438,233
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
Enrolled House Bill 5039 (HB 5039-A) Page 1
of expenses from federal funds other than those described  in section 2 of this 2019 Act, col-
lected or received by the Department of Transportation, for the following purposes:
(1) Driver and motor
vehicle services ..................... $ 2,103,458
(2) Transportation program
development.......................... $ 202,339
(3) Public transit ........................ $ 73,747,297
(4) Rail........................................ $ 17,177,757
(5) Transportation safety ........... $ 20,205,087
(6) Central services .................... $ 300,367
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$118,775,740 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Department of Transportation for debt service.
SECTION 5. For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2019, expenditures by the Department
of Transportation from federal funds for debt service  on Build America Bonds are not lim-
ited.
SECTION 6. For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2019, expenditures by the Department
of Transportation from the Oregon Transportation  Infrastructure Fund established under
ORS 367.015 for debt service and for internally reimbursed expenditures are not limited.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 4 (2), chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received  as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 4, chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for maintenance and emergency  relief programs, is
increased by $29,146,011.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 4 (8), chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 4, chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2017, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for the local government program,  is decreased by
$29,146,011.
SECTION 9. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 5039 (HB 5039-A) Page 2
Passed by House June 20, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5039 (HB 5039-A) Page 3